Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-132 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Hearing aid":
1. Means any wearable[, nondisposable instrument or] device designed for, offered for the purpose
of, or represented as aiding persons with or compensating for,[to aid or compensate for]
impaired[ human] hearing;
2. Includes[ and] any parts, attachments, or accessories, including earmolds; and[, but excluding ]
3. Does not include batteries and cords; and
(b) "Related services" means those services necessary to assess, select, and appropriately adjust or fit the
hearing aid to ensure optimal performance.
(2) A health benefit plan shall provide coverage, subject to all applicable copayments, coinsurance, deductibles,
and out-of-pocket limits, for the full cost of one (1) hearing aid per hearing-impaired ear up to two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500)[one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400)] every thirty-six (36) months for
hearing aids for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age and all related services which shall be
prescribed by an audiologist licensed under KRS Chapter 334A and dispensed by an audiologist or hearing
instrument specialist licensed under KRS Chapter 334.
(3) An[The] insured may choose a higher priced hearing aid and may pay the difference in cost above the two
thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500)[one thousand four hundred dollar ($1,400)] limit as provided in this
section without any financial or contractual penalty to the insured or to the provider of the hearing aid.
(4)[(3)] A health benefit plan shall not be required to pay a claim filed by its insured for payment of the cost of
a hearing aid under the coverage required by [subsection (2) of ]this section if less than three (3) years prior to
the date of the claim the[its] insured filed a claim for payment of the cost of a hearing aid under the required
coverage and the claim was paid by any health benefit plan.
(5) (a) An insurer or administrator that utilizes a network to provide hearing aids and related services under
a health benefit plan shall ensure that the network is reasonably adequate and accessible with respect
to the provision of hearing aids and related services required to be covered under this section.
(b) A reasonably adequate and accessible network, with respect to the provision of hearing aids and
related services required to be covered under this section, shall, at a minimum offer an adequate
number of accessible audiologists in accordance with the requirements set forth for managed care
plans in KRS 304.17A-515.
Section 2. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly employed by any department,
office, board, agency, or branch of state government; or by a public postsecondary educational
institution; or by any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who is either a contributing member to any one
(1) of the retirement systems administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a
contractual contribution from the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an optional retirement plan
authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to participate in a retirement plan established by an
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
employer who ceases participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans administered by the
Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective cessation date in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System;
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a public charter school as
defined in KRS 160.1590;
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement allowance from the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System's optional retirement plan authorized by KRS
161.567, except that a person who is receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five
(65) or older shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively employed pursuant to
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees and retirees who are
entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health benefit plan as defined in
KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a managed care plan as defined in
KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the recommendation of the secretary of
the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and
45A.090, from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group health benefit
plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance organization (HMO), preferred provider
organization (PPO), point of service (POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of employers governed by
the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B, all employers of any class of employees or former
employees shall enter into a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the
state health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to designating the entity
responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of policies required for proper plan administration,
acceptance of the contractual provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient administration of the health
insurance program. Health insurance coverage provided to state employees under this section shall, at a
minimum, contain the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1, 1994,
and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection (13) of this section. All employees
and other persons for whom the health care coverage is provided or made available shall annually be
given an option to elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the Commonwealth
or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of coverage options determined by the competitive
bid process under the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available during
annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance and may contain the
provisions the commissioner of insurance approves, whether or not otherwise permitted by the
insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to provide coverage to all
members of the state group, including active employees and retirees and their eligible covered
dependents and beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as provided in
subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall also
agree to rate all employees as a single entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure
their active employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as otherwise provided
in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.

CHAPTER 26 3
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to provide enrollment,
claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with
the understanding that the data shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic
form and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject to penalties for
noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel
Cabinet shall take strict precautions to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of providing stipulated data to
the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities for timely analysis of
data received from carriers and, to the extent possible, provide in the request-for-proposal specifics
relating to data requirements, electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The
Commonwealth shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier and shall
develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The Personnel Cabinet shall include in
the October annual report submitted pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the
General Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the financial stability of
the program, which shall include but not be limited to loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment,
measurements of carrier quality of service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily
required mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report also shall provide
a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves,
and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance program for its active
employees terminates participation and there is a state appropriation for the employer's contribution for
active employees' health insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored employee health insurance
program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements have been processed shall
be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall provide an amount at
least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer portion of the health insurance premium. For
any participating entity that used the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be
equal to but not greater than the state contribution rate.
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary education
institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or dental coverage, if any, in
excess of the premium amount contributed by any department, board, agency, postsecondary education
institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the service area of an insurer
offering a managed health care plan, under which he or she has elected coverage, into either the service area of
another managed health care plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or transfer, to change his or her
coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or
branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government shall constitute
compensation to an insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the compensation of
such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or
consolidated local government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes of employees covered,
amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or groups of employees, policy options, terms of
eligibility, and continuation of insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an employee regardless of the
child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall
be considered disabled if he or she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability
benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a period of not less than one (1)
year.
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance
Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance
program for employees. The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing authorities,
members representing school districts from each of the seven (7) Supreme Court districts, members
representing state government from each of the seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members
representing retirees under age sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3) members at large. The
secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky
Education Association, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee
organization of nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the
Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky
League of Cities, and two (2) members from a list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each
state employee organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll deduction. The
advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and shall meet quarterly.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies provided to employees
pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state
funds be used for the purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be grounds for an insured to
appeal a formulary change through the established appeal procedures approved by the Department of
Insurance, if the physician supervising the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the
patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health insurance program as a retiree, or
the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be
eligible to receive the state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any other
employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not preclude a retiree and an active
employee spouse from using both contributions to the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored
health insurance policy for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of this section shall include a
mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for state employees. Maintenance drugs may be
dispensed by mail order in accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located within the geographic
coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets the terms and conditions for participation
established by the insurer, including price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order
option. The retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled substance classified in Schedule II.
(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide
coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing aid-related services for insured individuals under
eighteen (18) years of age, subject to a cap of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)[one thousand four
hundred dollars ($1,400)] every thirty-six (36) months pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.
(15) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide coverage for
the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(16) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide coverage for
obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant to KRS 304.17A-258.

CHAPTER 26 5
(17) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same county, and if the hospital located
within that county does not offer surgical services, intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II
neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the
employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide those services, and the state
contribution for the plan shall be the amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in counties in which the hospitals do
not offer surgical services, intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic
cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee may select a plan
available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that does provide those services, and the state
contribution for the plan shall be the amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(19) The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and in the best interests of the
state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage under this section to submit bids that may
vary county by county or by larger geographic areas.
(20) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health insurance coverage for
calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects the statewide rating structure provided in calendar
year 2003 and a bid scenario that allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that
may vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which shall be the same as the
partnership regions designated by the Department for Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky
Health Care Partnership Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county within the region or regions
for which the bid is submitted and include but not be restricted to a preferred provider organization
(PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the carrier all of the counties
included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance
with this subsection to be in the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including other requirements or
criteria in the request for proposal.
(21) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or after July 12, 2006, to public
employees pursuant to this section which provides coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath
duly licensed under KRS Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of coverage to optometrists as
allowed for those services rendered by physicians or osteopaths.
(22) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to public employees pursuant to
this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264; and
(s) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this subsection.
(23) (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to public employees
pursuant to this section shall provide a special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible
for coverage in accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public employee is initially
offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special
enrollment rights under this subsection.
Section 3. This Act applies to health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 4. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.